waterfox/browser/locales/fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.aff
# This Source Code Form is subject to the terms of the BrowserWorks Public
# License, v. 2.0. If a copy of the MPL was not distributed with this
# file, You can obtain one at http://mozilla.org/MPL/2.0/.

# AFFIXES DU DICTIONNAIRE ORTHOGRAPHIQUE FRANÇAIS “TOUTES VARIANTES” v7.0
# par Olivier R. -- licence MPL 2.0
# Pour améliorer le dictionnaire, allez sur https://grammalecte.net/



SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -’'1234567890.


TRY esntiarulodcpmévqfgbhàxèjyêMILzACçôîPâùJFSûBVœRDGNETHXkïOwKWYUëQÉZŒüãÎáöóÈíæÅñäśńÿ


MAP 25
MAP aàâäAÀÂÄ
MAP eéèêëEÉÈÊË
MAP iîïyIÎÏY
MAP oôöOÔÖ
MAP uùûüUÙÛÜ
MAP cçCÇ
MAP bB
MAP dD
MAP fF
MAP gG
MAP hH
MAP jJ
MAP kK
MAP lL
MAP mM
MAP nN
MAP pP
MAP qQ
MAP rR
MAP sS
MAP tT
MAP vV
MAP wW
MAP xX
MAP zZ

REP 110
REP a â
REP â a
REP e é
REP é e
REP e ê
REP ê e
REP e è
REP è e
REP i î
REP î i
REP o ô
REP ô o
REP u û
REP û u
REP A Â
REP Â A
REP E É
REP É E
REP E Ê
REP Ê E
REP E È
REP È E
REP I Î
REP Î I
REP O Ô
REP Ô O
REP U Û
REP Û U
REP ^Ca$ Ça
REP ^l l'
REP ^d d'
REP ^n n'
REP ^s s'
REP ^j j'
REP ^m m'
REP ^t t'
REP ^c c'
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP c qu
REP qu c
REP k qu
REP qu k
REP x ct
REP ct x
REP bb b
REP b bb
REP cc c
REP c cc
REP ff f
REP f ff
REP ll l
REP l ll
REP mm m
REP m mm
REP nn n
REP n nn
REP pp p
REP p pp
REP rr r
REP r rr
REP ss s
REP s ss
REP ss c
REP c ss
REP ss ç
REP ç ss
REP tt t
REP t tt
REP œ oe
REP oe œ
REP æ ae
REP ae æ
REP ai é
REP é ai
REP ai è
REP è ai
REP ai ê
REP ê ai
REP ei é
REP é ei
REP ei è
REP è ei
REP ei ê
REP ê ei
REP o au
REP au o
REP o eau
REP eau o
REP ett èt
REP èt ett
REP ell èl
REP èl ell
REP t th
REP th t
REP ième$ e
REP ème$ e
REP è$ e
REP mn$ min
REP ogue$ ogiste
REP ogiste$ ogue
REP disez$ dites
REP fesez$ faites
REP faisez$ faites
REP puit puits
REP sanctionnable punissable
REP questionnable discutable
REP antitartre détartrant
REP email courriel
REP construirent construisirent




KEY azertyuiop|qsdfghjklmù|wxcvbn|aéz|yèu|iço|oàp|aqz|zse|edr|rft|tgy|yhu|uji|iko|olpm|qws|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj

ICONV 42
ICONV ’ '
ICONV ʼ '
ICONV ﬃ ffi
ICONV ﬄ ffl
ICONV ﬀ ff
ICONV ﬅ ft
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV ﬆ st
ICONV ſ s
ICONV à à
ICONV â â
ICONV ä ä
ICONV é é
ICONV è è
ICONV ê ê
ICONV ë ë
ICONV î î
ICONV ï ï
ICONV ô ô
ICONV ö ö
ICONV ù ù
ICONV û û
ICONV ü ü
ICONV ÿ ÿ
ICONV ç ç
ICONV À À
ICONV Â Â
ICONV Ä Ä
ICONV É É
ICONV È È
ICONV Ê Ê
ICONV Ë Ë
ICONV Î Î
ICONV Ï Ï
ICONV Ô Ô
ICONV Ö Ö
ICONV Ù Ù
ICONV Û Û
ICONV Ü Ü
ICONV Ÿ Ÿ
ICONV Ç Ç

OCONV 1
OCONV ' ’



FLAG long

FULLSTRIP

NEEDAFFIX ()

FORBIDDENWORD {}

CIRCUMFIX **

KEEPCASE ||

NOSUGGEST --



BREAK 7
BREAK -
BREAK .
BREAK ·
BREAK ^‘
BREAK ^'
BREAK '$
BREAK ’$






PFX L' Y 34
PFX L' 0 l' . dp:le|la+
PFX L' a l'A a dp:le|la+
PFX L' à l'À à dp:le|la+
PFX L' â l'Â â dp:le|la+
PFX L' e l'E e dp:le|la+
PFX L' é l'É é dp:le|la+
PFX L' è l'È è dp:le|la+
PFX L' ê l'Ê ê dp:le|la+
PFX L' i l'I i dp:le|la+
PFX L' î l'Î î dp:le|la+
PFX L' o l'O o dp:le|la+
PFX L' ô l'Ô ô dp:le|la+
PFX L' u l'U u dp:le|la+
PFX L' y l'Y y dp:le|la+
PFX L' h l'H h dp:le|la+
PFX L' œ l'Œ œ dp:le|la+
PFX L' æ l'Æ æ dp:le|la+
PFX L' 0 L' . dp:le|la+
PFX L' a L'A a dp:le|la+
PFX L' à L'À à dp:le|la+
PFX L' â L'Â â dp:le|la+
PFX L' e L'E e dp:le|la+
PFX L' é L'É é dp:le|la+
PFX L' è L'È è dp:le|la+
PFX L' ê L'Ê ê dp:le|la+
PFX L' i L'I i dp:le|la+
PFX L' î L'Î î dp:le|la+
PFX L' o L'O o dp:le|la+
PFX L' ô L'Ô ô dp:le|la+
PFX L' u L'U u dp:le|la+
PFX L' y L'Y y dp:le|la+
PFX L' h L'H h dp:le|la+
PFX L' œ L'Œ œ dp:le|la+
PFX L' æ L'Æ æ dp:le|la+

PFX D' Y 34
PFX D' 0 d' . dp:de+
PFX D' a d'A a dp:de+
PFX D' à d'À à dp:de+
PFX D' â d'Â â dp:de+
PFX D' e d'E e dp:de+
PFX D' é d'É é dp:de+
PFX D' è d'È è dp:de+
PFX D' ê d'Ê ê dp:de+
PFX D' i d'I i dp:de+
PFX D' î d'Î î dp:de+
PFX D' o d'O o dp:de+
PFX D' ô d'Ô ô dp:de+
PFX D' u d'U u dp:de+
PFX D' y d'Y y dp:de+
PFX D' h d'H h dp:de+
PFX D' œ d'Œ œ dp:de+
PFX D' æ d'Æ æ dp:de+
PFX D' 0 D' . dp:de+
PFX D' a D'A a dp:de+
PFX D' à D'À à dp:de+
PFX D' â D'Â â dp:de+
PFX D' e D'E e dp:de+
PFX D' é D'É é dp:de+
PFX D' è D'È è dp:de+
PFX D' ê D'Ê ê dp:de+
PFX D' i D'I i dp:de+
PFX D' î D'Î î dp:de+
PFX D' o D'O o dp:de+
PFX D' ô D'Ô ô dp:de+
PFX D' u D'U u dp:de+
PFX D' y D'Y y dp:de+
PFX D' h D'H h dp:de+
PFX D' œ D'Œ œ dp:de+
PFX D' æ D'Æ æ dp:de+

PFX Q' Y 34
PFX Q' 0 qu' . dp:que+
PFX Q' a qu'A a dp:que+
PFX Q' à qu'À à dp:que+
PFX Q' â qu'Â â dp:que+
PFX Q' e qu'E e dp:que+
PFX Q' é qu'É é dp:que+
PFX Q' è qu'È è dp:que+
PFX Q' ê qu'Ê ê dp:que+
PFX Q' i qu'I i dp:que+
PFX Q' î qu'Î î dp:que+
PFX Q' o qu'O o dp:que+
PFX Q' ô qu'Ô ô dp:que+
PFX Q' u qu'U u dp:que+
PFX Q' y qu'Y y dp:que+
PFX Q' h qu'H h dp:que+
PFX Q' œ qu'Œ œ dp:que+
PFX Q' æ qu'Æ æ dp:que+
PFX Q' 0 Qu' . dp:que+
PFX Q' a Qu'A a dp:que+
PFX Q' à Qu'À à dp:que+
PFX Q' â Qu'Â â dp:que+
PFX Q' e Qu'E e dp:que+
PFX Q' é Qu'É é dp:que+
PFX Q' è Qu'È è dp:que+
PFX Q' ê Qu'Ê ê dp:que+
PFX Q' i Qu'I i dp:que+
PFX Q' î Qu'Î î dp:que+
PFX Q' o Qu'O o dp:que+
PFX Q' ô Qu'Ô ô dp:que+
PFX Q' u Qu'U u dp:que+
PFX Q' y Qu'Y y dp:que+
PFX Q' h Qu'H h dp:que+
PFX Q' œ Qu'Œ œ dp:que+
PFX Q' æ Qu'Æ æ dp:que+

PFX Q* Y 6
PFX Q* 0 quoiqu' . dp:quoique+
PFX Q* 0 puisqu' . dp:puisque+
PFX Q* 0 lorsqu' . dp:lorsque+
PFX Q* 0 Quoiqu' . dp:quoique+
PFX Q* 0 Puisqu' . dp:puisque+
PFX Q* 0 Lorsqu' . dp:lorsque+

PFX Qj Y 1
PFX Qj 0 jusqu' . dp:jusque+

PFX Si Y 1
PFX Si 0 s' i[le] dp:si+

SFX S. Y 2
SFX S. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz] is:sg
SFX S. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz] is:pl

SFX S= Y 1
SFX S= 0 s/L'D'Q' [^sxz]

SFX X. Y 4
SFX X. 0 0/L'D'Q' [ul] is:sg
SFX X. 0 x/D'Q' [aeoœ]u is:pl
SFX X. l ux/D'Q' al is:pl
SFX X. il ux/D'Q' ail is:pl

SFX A. Y 11
SFX A. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz] is:sg
SFX A. 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz] is:inv
SFX A. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz] is:pl
SFX A. an en/D'Q' an is:pl
SFX A. f ves/D'Q' f is:pl
SFX A. h hes/D'Q' h is:pl
SFX A. s ses/D'Q' s is:pl
SFX A. x xes/D'Q' x is:pl
SFX A. y ies/D'Q' y is:pl
SFX A. zz zzes/D'Q' zz is:pl
SFX A. z zzes/D'Q' [^z]z is:pl

SFX I. Y 9
SFX I. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz] is:sg
SFX I. 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz] is:inv
SFX I. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz] is:pl
SFX I. a e/D'Q' a is:pl
SFX I. e i/D'Q' e is:pl
SFX I. en ina/D'Q' en is:pl
SFX I. o i/D'Q' o is:pl
SFX I. um a/D'Q' um is:pl
SFX I. us i/D'Q' us is:pl

SFX F. Y 33
SFX F. 0 0/L'D'Q' [^sxz] is:mas is:sg
SFX F. 0 s/D'Q' [^sxz] is:mas is:pl
SFX F. 0 0/L'D'Q' [sxz] is:mas is:inv
SFX F. 0 e/L'D'Q' [éiïudhlsz] is:fem is:sg
SFX F. 0 es/D'Q' [éiïudhlsz] is:fem is:pl
SFX F. 0 e/L'D'Q' [^e][knmrt] is:fem is:sg
SFX F. 0 es/D'Q' [^e][knmrt] is:fem is:pl
SFX F. ec èche/L'D'Q' sec is:fem is:sg
SFX F. ec èches/D'Q' sec is:fem is:pl
SFX F. ef ève/L'D'Q' ef is:fem is:sg
SFX F. ef èves/D'Q' ef is:fem is:pl
SFX F. ète étesse/L'D'Q' ète is:fem is:sg
SFX F. ète étesses/D'Q' ète is:fem is:pl
SFX F. f ve/L'D'Q' [iïu]f is:fem is:sg
SFX F. f ves/D'Q' [iïu]f is:fem is:pl
SFX F. 0 e/L'D'Q' of is:fem is:sg
SFX F. 0 es/D'Q' of is:fem is:pl
SFX F. ek èke/L'D'Q' ek is:fem is:sg
SFX F. ek èkes/D'Q' ek is:fem is:pl
SFX F. en ène/L'D'Q' en is:fem is:sg
SFX F. en ènes/D'Q' en is:fem is:pl
SFX F. er ère/L'D'Q' er is:fem is:sg
SFX F. er ères/D'Q' er is:fem is:pl
SFX F. et ète/L'D'Q' et is:fem is:sg
SFX F. et ètes/D'Q' et is:fem is:pl
SFX F. c que/L'D'Q' [iru]c is:fem is:sg
SFX F. c ques/D'Q' [iru]c is:fem is:pl
SFX F. 0 que/L'D'Q' grec is:fem is:sg
SFX F. 0 ques/D'Q' grec is:fem is:pl
SFX F. 0 he/L'D'Q' blanc is:fem is:sg
SFX F. 0 hes/D'Q' blanc is:fem is:pl
SFX F. 0 ue/L'D'Q' long is:fem is:sg
SFX F. 0 ues/D'Q' long is:fem is:pl

SFX Fs Y 4
SFX Fs 0 0/L'D'Q' eur is:mas is:sg
SFX Fs 0 s/D'Q' eur is:mas is:pl
SFX Fs r se/L'D'Q' eur is:fem is:sg
SFX Fs r ses/D'Q' eur is:fem is:pl

SFX Fc Y 4
SFX Fc 0 0/L'D'Q' [td]eur is:mas is:sg
SFX Fc 0 s/D'Q' [td]eur is:mas is:pl
SFX Fc eur rice/L'D'Q' [td]eur is:fem is:sg
SFX Fc eur rices/D'Q' [td]eur is:fem is:pl

SFX Fe Y 4
SFX Fe 0 0/L'D'Q' eur is:mas is:sg
SFX Fe 0 s/D'Q' eur is:mas is:pl
SFX Fe eur eresse/L'D'Q' eur is:fem is:sg
SFX Fe eur eresses/D'Q' eur is:fem is:pl
